Wyoming statutes. Title 6 Crimes and Offenses
Article 3. Sexual Assault
§ 6-2-302.
Sexual assault in the first degree.

Any actor who inflicts sexual intrusion on a victim commits a sexual assault in the first degree if:

The actor causes submission of the victim through the actual application, reasonably calculated to cause submission of the victim, of physical force or forcible confinement;

The actor causes submission of the victim by threat of death, serious bodily injury, extreme physical pain or kidnapping to be inflicted on anyone and the victim reasonably believes that the actor has the present ability to execute these threats;

The victim is physically helpless, and the actor knows or reasonably should know that the victim is physically helpless and that the victim has not consented; or

The actor knows or reasonably should know that the victim through a mental illness, mental deficiency or developmental disability is incapable of appraising the nature of the victim’s conduct.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to sexual battery, see §

6-2-313

.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Subsection (a) is not unconstitutionally vague.

Weddle v. State, 621 P.2d 231,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 327

(Wyo. 1980).

Because an ordinary intelligent person applying common sense to subsection (a)(iv) would not have to guess at its meaning to understand that to avoid punishment, one must refrain from performing a sex act with a person who the actor knows, or should have known, is mentally incapable of understanding the nature and possible consequences of sexual activity, subsection (a)(iv) is not unconstitutionally vague. Righter v. State, 752 P.2d 416,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 1988).

General intent crime. —

First-degree sexual assault is a general intent crime, and therefore, the trial court must only find that the act was done voluntarily before accepting defendant's guilty plea. If the facts and circumstances of the offense presented at the plea hearing can reasonably be construed to be for sexual abuse, that is sufficient although the actor's subjective intent may, according to his statement, have been something else. Bryan v. State, 745 P.2d 905,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 546

(Wyo. 1987).

Hierarchical framework. —

A review of the sexual assault statutes, §§

6-2-302

to

6-2-304

, readily indicates that the legislature intended them to operate as an integrated whole; the statutory scheme evidences a hierarchical framework that shows the seriousness attached to each crime. Misenheimer v. State, 2001 WY 65, 27 P.3d 273,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 76

(Wyo. 2001), cert. denied, 534 U.S. 1092, 122 S. Ct. 836, 151 L. Ed. 2d 716, 2002 U.S. LEXIS 18 (U.S. 2002).

Habitual offender. —

District court
properly sentenced defendant to life in prison because a rational
trier of fact could have concluded that he committed a felony offense
in Ohio and that he was the individual who committed first-degree
sexual assault and third-degree sexual abuse of a minor; the testimony
of a court clerk from Ohio showed that defendant was convicted of
a felony in Ohio, and the State proved that defendant committed all
three crimes being used against him to prove he was a habitual offender. Rogers v. State, 2015 WY 48, 346 P.3d 934,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 54

(Wyo. 2015).

No merger of first degree sexual assault and third degree sexual
abuse of a minor.—

Each conviction
and sentence passed the dispositive Blockburger test because each
the charged offenses, first-degree sexual assault and third-degree
sexual abuse of a minor in violation of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§ 6-2-302(a)(i) and 6-2-316(a)(ii) and (a)(iv), required proof of at least one additional
element that the others did not, evidencing the legislature's intent
to make the crimes separate offenses and to impose separate punishments. Rogers v. State, 2015 WY 48, 346 P.3d 934,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 54

(Wyo. 2015).

In reading
of Wyo. Stat. Ann.§§ 6-2-302(a)(i) and 6-2-316(a)(ii) and (a)(iv), each is quite distinct from the other; the
first statute focuses on submission of the victim, and the second
statute, § 6-2-316(a)(ii), involves sexual intrusion, while the third charging
statute, § 6-2-316316(a)(iv), involves indecent liberties. Rogers v. State, 2015 WY 48, 346 P.3d 934,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 54

(Wyo. 2015).

Comparison with other law. —

The sexual assault statutes protect all persons; the indecent liberties statute, §

14-3-105

(repealed), only offers protection to those less than 18 years of age. Misenheimer v. State, 2001 WY 65, 27 P.3d 273,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 76

(Wyo. 2001), cert. denied, 534 U.S. 1092, 122 S. Ct. 836, 151 L. Ed. 2d 716, 2002 U.S. LEXIS 18 (U.S. 2002).

Violation of victim's person gravamen of offense. —

The actor is not to be punished because he has gratified or attempted to gratify his sexual desires but rather because he has violated the person of the victim. Hamill v. State, 602 P.2d 1212,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 483

(Wyo. 1979).

Resistance is not always necessary to establish lack of consent.

Gonzales v. State, 516 P.2d 592,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1973).

Resistance is not necessary under circumstances where resistance would be futile and would endanger the life of the female, and where she is overcome by superior strength or paralyzed by fear. Gonzales v. State, 516 P.2d 592,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1973).

“Lack of consent” is element specified in this section and may exist without resistance, e.g., through fear. Morris v. State, 644 P.2d 170,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 325

(Wyo. 1982).

Forcible rape can be established without proof of violence to the victim and that the victim need not always resist the assault. The gravamen of sexual assault in the first degree is lack of consent to the sexual penetration or intrusion, which can be shown by resistance. Resistance by a victim is not required, however, when: (1) resistance would be futile; (2) the victim is “overcome by superior strength”; or (3) the victim is “paralyzed by fear.” Seeley v. State, 715 P.2d 232,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 503

(Wyo. 1986).

The evidence was sufficient to support a conviction although it allegedly failed to establish that the victim earnestly resisted the assault. The evidence proved that the victim was overcome by superior strength and that resistance on her part would have been futile. Sanchez v. State, 751 P.2d 1300,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1988), overruled in part, Bean v. State, 2016 WY 48, 373 P.3d 372,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. 2016).

“Threat” against victim can be expressed by acts or conduct.

Richter v. State, 642 P.2d 1269,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 313

(Wyo. 1982), overruled, Westmark v. State, 693 P.2d 220,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 354

(Wyo. 1984).

There is difference between submission and consent,

and submission does not necessarily involve consent: acquiescence is not consent if induced by fear or reasonable apprehension of bodily harm. Brown v. State, 581 P.2d 189,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 205

(Wyo. 1978).

And consent may be limited. —

There is nothing inconsistent in one's consent to engage in sexual intercourse and in his or her refusal to engage in fellatio. Padilla v. State, 601 P.2d 189,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 468

(Wyo. 1979).

Determination of reasonableness rests with fact finder. —

The necessary element of reasonable apprehension and reasonable ground for fear of her safety is not a determination solely in the judgment of the prosecutrix, but the reasonableness must rest with the fact finder. Gonzales v. State, 516 P.2d 592,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1973).

And resistance or consent in sexual assault case is jury question.

See Brown v. State, 581 P.2d 189,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 205

(Wyo. 1978).

Marriage to victim not complete defense. —

The phrase “not by itself a defense” contained in §

6-2-307

is not vague because no objective standard is provided by which a person can measure contemplated conduct, because the standard by which conduct is to be measured is clearly outlined in subsection (a)(i). Section

6-2-307

clearly puts an assailant on notice that marriage to the victim of a sexual assault is not a complete defense, but may be considered along with other evidence in deciding the guilt of the defendant. Shunn v. State, 742 P.2d 775,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 508

(Wyo. 1987).

Evidence sufficient to sustain finding of consent by victim

to sexual intercourse. — See Padilla v. State, 601 P.2d 189,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 468

(Wyo. 1979).

Sufficiency of evidence. —

Evidence was sufficient to sustain defendant's conviction for sexual assault of developmentally disabled victim where he had prior experience with people who had Down's syndrome, he could observe that victim looked different, and he talked to victim. Saiz v. State, 2001 WY 76, 30 P.3d 21,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 2001).

Evidence was sufficient to sustain defendant's convictions for first-degree sexual assault where physical evidence, including pictures and testimony that the victim suffered injuries from physical restraint and battery and medical tests indicating the presence of fluids consistent with defendant's blood type found on the victim's clothing, corroborated the victim's version of events that her injuries were received when sexually assaulted by defendant. Daniel v. State, 2003 WY 132, 78 P.3d 205,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 162

(Wyo. 2003), cert. denied, 540 U.S. 1205, 124 S. Ct. 1476, 158 L. Ed. 2d 127, 2004 U.S. LEXIS 1455 (U.S. 2004).

Because victim's bruising was consistent with a sexual assault, and a reasonable jury could have inferred that the victim likely did not consent to having sex with the defendant because, had she consented, she would have removed her tampon, the jury could also reasonably find evidence sufficient to convict the defendant, notwithstanding defendant's assertion that because he was 69 years old, allegedly infirm, four inches shorter, and 20 pounds lighter than the 27-year-old victim, it would have been impossible to force the victim to have sexual intercourse and that since the victim had received training from a self-defense standpoint as a correction officer, she would have known how to avoid any such advance. Lujan v. State, 2004 WY 122, 99 P.3d 979,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 159

(Wyo. 2004).

Jury could reasonably conclude that victim was asleep and therefore physically helpless as required under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-2-301(a)(iii).
Haynes v. State, 2008 WY 75, 186 P.3d 1204,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 77

(Wyo. 2008).

Victim's testimony that defendant attempted to have sexual intercourse with her by force but could not complete vaginal penetration because she resisted, along with medical evidence of injuries to the inner portions of her genitalia, provided sufficient evidence to convict defendant of first degree sexual assault; sexual intrusion occurred when defendant penetrated the victim's labia or vulva.
Pryor v. State, 2009 WY 95, 212 P.3d 635,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 105

(Wyo. 2009).

Evidence was sufficient to convict defendant of first degree sexual assault under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-2-302(a)(iv) because the victim had a disability which made her incapable of appraising the nature of her conduct, and defendant was aware of both the disability and its effect upon the victim.
Tombroek v. State, 2009 WY 126, 217 P.3d 806,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 138

(Wyo. 2009), reh'g denied,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 159

(Wyo. Nov. 17, 2009).

Evidence was sufficient to convict defendant of first degree sexual assault under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-2-302(a)(i) by either physical force or forcible confinement because (1) after the victim refused to have sex with defendant, defendant got into bed, forced the victim's legs apart, and inserted his fist into her privates; (2) the victim tried to fight off defendant but he held her down with “his force,” and she was unable to escape; (3) the sexual assault nurse stated that of the approximately 200 exams she had performed during her career, the victim's injuries were the most serious she had seen; (4) he restrained her by placing one hand over her chest and another over her legs; and (5) she did not report the assault immediately as defendant was still in the house and, based on prior abuse, she feared his reaction if he found out that she had reported the incident.
Masias v. State, 2010 WY 81, 233 P.3d 944,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 86

(Wyo. 2010).

Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-2-302(a)(ii) simply required the State to prove that defendant threatened serious bodily injury or death to “anyone” and the victim reasonably believed he had the present ability to execute those threats, and the State was not obligated to prove that the threat was directed toward a specific person; as the victim described the events which took place throughout the night, it was clear that defendant threatened to kill her and, considering that he aimed the gun at her multiple times, she reasonably believed he had the ability to carry through with that threat.
Daves v. State, 2011 WY 47, 249 P.3d 250,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 2011).

Evidence was sufficient to convict defendant of third degree sexual assault and intentional abuse of a vulnerable adult because his continued contact after the victim said “no” and his grabbing her hand and placing it on his genitals constituted physical force reasonably calculated to cause submission; he knew or reasonably should have known that the victim through a mental deficiency or developmental disability was incapable of appraising the nature of her conduct as several witnesses testified that the victim’s physical characteristics and speech made her disability apparent; and, despite his intoxication, defendant was capable of forming the intent to abuse a vulnerable adult as he appeared coherent and oriented to time and place.
Brown v. State, 2019 WY 102, 450 P.3d 208,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 104

(Wyo. 2019).

Evidence was sufficient to support defendant’s conviction for first degree sexual assault, as the record was replete with evidence from which a reasonable jury could conclude that defendant caused submission of the victim by threat of serious bodily injury or extreme physical pain, and that she reasonably believed he had the present ability to execute those threats when he assaulted her, causing her to bleed from her rectum after the assault. Neidlinger v. State, 2021 WY 39, 482 P.3d 337,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 2021).

Evidence supported the conclusion defendant juvenile committed a delinquent act based on the testimony of nine witnesses, and the victim testified in detail about the events leading up to the sexual assault; when describing the sexual assault, the victim testified that she woke up to find defendant’s hand down her shorts, and his fingers were inside of her vagina. JP v. State, 2022 WY 94, 514 P.3d 785,

2022 Wyo. LEXIS 94

(Wyo. 2022).

Evidence sufficient to convict on multiple charges. —

Where the evidence showed that defendant abducted a victim at gunpoint, handcuffed the victim inside of a car, committed nonconsensual sexual acts upon the victim, and transported the victim without consent, there was sufficient evidence to convict defendant of kidnapping, first-degree sexual assault, and third-degree sexual assault. Dean v. State, 2003 WY 128, 77 P.3d 692,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 2003).

Proof actor knew of victim's physical helplessness must not be speculation. —

Where the state must prove beyond a reasonable doubt that the victim of first-degree sexual assault was physically helpless and that defendant knew, or should reasonably have known, that the victim was physically helpless, and it is apparent that the only evidence concerning the intent of defendant is that of a psychiatrist, who testified he would have to guess on this issue, it follows that the jury would have to guess or speculate on defendant's intent, and that is one of the evidentiary situations upon which the trial judge should not permit the case to go to the jury. Chavez v. State, 601 P.2d 166,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 470

(Wyo. 1979).

There was sufficient evidence concerning mental and developmental deficiencies of male victims

of a sexual assault to support the trial court's determination that they were incapable of appraising the nature of their conduct and that the defendant, who was also a male, “[knew] or reasonably should [have known]” of such deficiencies, as required by subsection (a)(iv). While both victims were determined to understand the difference between having sexual intercourse with a woman as opposed to a man, and to some degree the social stigma often associated with homosexual relations, neither victim was considered to be capable of making adult rationalizations or decisions about the activity itself, or to understand the ramifications of adult relationships which include sexual activity. Righter v. State, 752 P.2d 416,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 1988).

Expert witness testimony as to behavior of child sexual abuse victim. —

Where the expert witness discussed the typical behavior tendencies of a child sexual abuse victim and then related them to the victim, without directly vouching for the victim's credibility or using any synonymous terms like “fabricate” and where the expert did not state that he concluded that the victim had been abused, but instead stated that she fit the mold of behavior for sexual abuse, the expert's testimony did not violate the rule against vouching for credibility. Frenzel v. State, 849 P.2d 741,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 64

(Wyo. 1993).

Expert's testimony that most rape victims ask assailants not to tell was admissible,

where such testimony was intended to assist the jury to understand one aspect of the evidence and did not constitute testimony with respect to the veracity of the victim. Lessard v. State, 719 P.2d 227,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 558

(Wyo. 1986).

Kidnapping and sexual assault did not merge. —

The force used to accomplish the kidnapping was sufficient justification to enhance the penalty for aggravated kidnapping where it was separate and distinct from the force and confinement the defendant imposed upon the victim, and where there were repeated sexual assaults in his vehicle, this was not an instance that would demand merger of the sexual assaults with the independent crime of aggravated kidnapping. McDermott v. State, 870 P.2d 339,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1994), overruled, Jones v. State, 902 P.2d 686,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 1995).

Distinct incidents of sexual assault constitute separate offenses. —

Where separate and distinct incidents of sexual assault occur in different ways, each in a different time period or where the same type of sexual assault occurs more than once on the same victim in different time periods, each incident constitutes a separate definable criminal offense which can be prosecuted individually. Hamill v. State, 602 P.2d 1212,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 483

(Wyo. 1979).

Elements of attempted sexual assault are different

from those of sexual assault in the first degree because of the requirement of a specific intent in the attempt statute. Sexual assault in the first degree is a general intent crime, and if the lesser offense has elements not included in the greater offense, no lesser included offense instruction is warranted. Seeley v. State, 715 P.2d 232,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 503

(Wyo. 1986).

Second-degree sexual assault is not lesser included offense of first-degree sexual assault. —

The elements found in second-degree sexual assault of causing submission of the victim by threatening to retaliate by being in a position of authority over the victim and using this position of authority to cause the victim to submit require elements different from those found in first-degree sexual assault. Jackson v. State, 891 P.2d 70,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1995).

Attempted first-degree sexual assault and attempted second-degree sexual assault mutually exclusive. —

A person cannot commit both attempted first-degree sexual assault and attempted second-degree sexual assault in the same criminal incident; these crimes are mutually exclusive. Harris v. State, 933 P.2d 1114,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 1997).

Third-degree sexual assault not lesser included offense. —

It was plain error for the trial judge to instruct the jury that third-degree sexual assault is a lesser included offense of first-degree sexual assault. Third-degree sexual assault cannot be a lesser included offense to first-degree sexual assault because its elements are not contained within the set of elements for first-degree sexual assault. Craney v. State, 798 P.2d 1202,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 1990).

Battery not lesser included offense. —

Since battery requires proof of an element not required for proof of first-degree sexual assault, a lesser included offense instruction need not be given. Battery requires the intentional, knowing and reckless causing of bodily injury to another or an unlawful touching in a rude, insolent or angry manner. These are not elements of first-degree sexual assault. Sandy v. State, 870 P.2d 352,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1994).

Jury instructions for attempted sexual assault. —

In a prosecution for attempted first-degree sexual assault, the trial court did not commit error in combining the elements of first-degree sexual assault and attempt into one jury instruction where the instruction left no doubt as to under what circumstances the crime could be found to have been committed. Compton v. State, 931 P.2d 936,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1997).

In a prosecution for attempted first-degree sexual assault, the trial court's failure to instruct the jury on the statutory definition of substantial step towards commission of the crime was error, but not plain error, where the state's proof showed that the defendant attempted to force penetration on his sleeping victim. Compton v. State, 931 P.2d 936,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1997).

Lesser-included offense instructions for second-degree and third-degree sexual assault not warranted. —

The manner of committing sexual assault in the second degree and sexual assault in the third degree not only is differentiated under the statutory language, but obviously these offenses can be committed by acts or conduct different from that proscribed by the statute forbidding sexual assault in the first degree. Because of this, every element of the claimed lesser included offenses of sexual assault in the second degree and sexual assault in the third degree was not necessarily encompassed within the commission of the greater offense of sexual assault in the first degree, and the lesser included offense instructions were not required. Also, with respect to the claimed lesser included offense of sexual assault in the third degree, the evidence justified a conclusion of penetration or nothing and an instruction relating to “sexual contact” would not have been appropriate. Seeley v. State, 715 P.2d 232,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 503

(Wyo. 1986).

Lesser-included offense instruction of sexual battery not applicable. —

Although an appellate court did not decide whether sexual battery was a lesser-included offense of first-degree sexual assault and third-degree sexual assault, a trial court did not err by refusing to give a lesser-included offense instruction because the defendant admitted that sexual contact had occurred and the theory of the defense, consent, only allowed a jury to find defendant guilty or not guilty of the greater offense. Dean v. State, 2003 WY 128, 77 P.3d 692,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 2003).

Assault and battery instruction inappropriate where defendant claims no contact with victim. —

In light of the rule that a lesser included offense instruction need be given only when the trial court determines that the evidence before the jury warrants the giving of such an instruction, a proffered instruction relating to assault and battery clearly was inappropriate. The trial theory of the defendant was that he had no contact with the victim, and the testimony of the victim was that of sexual assault. Seeley v. State, 715 P.2d 232,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 503

(Wyo. 1986).

Defendant not necessarily guilty of all alleged sexual assaults occurring within same transaction. —

Divergent findings in the jury's verdict, which found defendant guilty of one count of sexual assault and one count of aggravated burglary but not guilty with respect to two other counts of sexual assault alleged to be based upon the same transaction, were not a basis for any claim of error on appeal. Lessard v. State, 719 P.2d 227,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 558

(Wyo. 1986).

Intent. —

In the former crime of rape no intent was requisite other than that evidenced by the doing of the acts constituting the offense charged. Rhodes v. State, 462 P.2d 722,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 170

(Wyo. 1969).

Evidence sustained defendant's conviction

where the victim testified that defendant took her to a location outside of town against her will, dropped his pants, grabbed her by the hair and forced her to perform oral sex upon him. Rathbun v. State, 802 P.2d 881,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 154

(Wyo. 1990).

The evidence was sufficient to sustain defendant's conviction for first degree sexual assault, although the victim was unable to identify defendant and the circumstantial evidence, including a hat, fuel records, phone records, and body fluids, was somewhat ambivalent in terms of inculpating defendant; it was for the jury to decide issues of credibility. Hadden v. State, 2002 WY 41, 42 P.3d 495,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 537 U.S. 868, 123 S. Ct. 272, 154 L. Ed. 2d 114, 2002 U.S. LEXIS 5881 (U.S. 2002).

Evidence sufficient to sustain attempt conviction. —

The court did not abuse its discretion by denying the defendant's motion for a judgment of acquittal, where a jury could infer that the victim had not consented to a sexual intrusion, and that the defendant abandoned his attempt to commit first-degree sexual assault because the victim refused to open her mouth or because he heard the police entering the victim's apartment. Cardenas v. State, 811 P.2d 989,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 94

(Wyo. 1991), reh'g denied,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 107

(Wyo. June 14, 1991).

Minimum term not required. —

Former Section 6-63(A) provided that a person who had been convicted of first-degree rape could be sentenced to life in prison and because the district court determined that a life sentence was appropriate, it was not bound to set a minimum term under former Section 7-313 (Section

7-13-201

).
Dolence v. State, 921 P.2d 1103,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1996).

Double jeopardy. —

Separate and distinct acts of sexual intrusion, even those separated in time only by a matter of seconds, can properly be punished as separate crimes without violating double jeopardy protections. Frenzel v. State, 938 P.2d 867,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 86

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 522 U.S. 959, 118 S. Ct. 388, 139 L. Ed. 2d 303, 1997 U.S. LEXIS 6635 (U.S. 1997).

No double jeopardy violation

in prosecution for conspiracy to commit rape since the conduct constituting the crime of conspiracy is separate and apart from the conduct that makes up the substantive offenses of rape and kidnapping. Phillips v. State, 835 P.2d 1062,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 76

(Wyo. 1992), reh'g denied,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. July 8, 1992).

A substantive crime, and a conspiracy to commit that crime, are not the same offense for double jeopardy purposes, and the fact that there is a mere overlap of proof between two prosecutions does not establish a double jeopardy violation. Harvey v. State, 835 P.2d 1074,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 1992), reh'g denied,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 85

(Wyo. July 8, 1992), cert. denied, 506 U.S. 1022, 113 S. Ct. 661, 121 L. Ed. 2d 586, 1992 U.S. LEXIS 7732 (U.S. 1992).

Each act of intrusion prohibited. —

This section prohibits individual acts of sexual intrusion. Frenzel v. State, 938 P.2d 867,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 86

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 522 U.S. 959, 118 S. Ct. 388, 139 L. Ed. 2d 303, 1997 U.S. LEXIS 6635 (U.S. 1997).

Even though defendant's sexual intrusions occurred on the same date, and may have been separated in time by only a matter of minutes, each sexual intrusion by intercourse, fellatio, or other act was a separate and distinct crime and could be punished separately. Frenzel v. State, 938 P.2d 867,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 86

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 522 U.S. 959, 118 S. Ct. 388, 139 L. Ed. 2d 303, 1997 U.S. LEXIS 6635 (U.S. 1997).

The legislature intended separate punishments

for the crime of aggravated kidnapping and for the crime of sexual assault in the first degree because, once the sexual assault is inflicted, the victim has been harmed and cannot be released “substantially unharmed.” McDermott v. State, 870 P.2d 339,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1994), overruled, Jones v. State, 902 P.2d 686,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 1995).

Double jeopardy.—

After defendant was acquitted of first- and second-degree sexual assault, and a jury hung as to third-degree sexual assault, a retrial on third-degree sexual assault did not violate double jeopardy because a bill of particulars included conduct other than cunnilingus for which defendant was acquitted, which the crime excluded. Cercy v. State, 2019 WY 131, 455 P.3d 678,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Wyo. 2019).

Defendant's claims sentencing barred by res judicata. —

Since defendant's original consolidated sentence for multiple convictions was clearly within the statutory parameters of former §

6-4-306

and he could show no good cause why he failed to challenge his consolidated sentence in two earlier proceedings, the district court did not err in finding defendant's claims barred by the doctrine of res judicata. Hamill v. State, 948 P.2d 1356,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 1997).

Victim impact testimony permissible to bolster credibility. —

Where defendant was charged with first-degree sexual assault after drugging his victim and subsequently raping her, the trial court did not err in permitting the victim and her husband to testify regarding the impact that the sexual assault had upon the victim because defendant attacked the victim's credibility by claiming that the sexual encounter was consensual and it was not error to utilize victim impact testimony to bolster the credibility of the victim after defendant's attack upon her credibility.
Schreibvogel v. State, 2010 WY 45, 228 P.3d 874,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 2010).

Evidentiary errors required reversal. —

A defendant's conviction under this section for sexual assault was reversed, where, among other evidentiary errors, (1) even though the trial court had ordered that witnesses not be asked to vouch for the credibility of the child who was the alleged victim, the prosecutor continued to do so, despite admonitions and sustained objections; and (2) the improper introduction of a volume of evidence of the defendant's “lifestyle” or character permeated the trial. Wilde v. State, 2003 WY 93, 74 P.3d 699,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 2003).

Applied

in

Strand v. State, 36 Wyo. 78, 252 P. 1030,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(1927); State v. Thomas, 38 Wyo. 72, 264 P. 1017,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(1928); State v. Quirk, 38 Wyo. 462, 268 P. 189,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 65

(1928); State v. Mau, 41 Wyo. 365, 285 P. 992,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(1930); State v. Holm, 67 Wyo. 360, 224 P.2d 500,

1950 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(1950); Elmer v. State, 463 P.2d 14,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 171

(Wyo. 1969); Stambaugh v. State, 613 P.2d 1237,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 291

(Wyo. 1980); Heinrich v. State, 638 P.2d 641,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 405

(Wyo. 1981); Taylor v. State, 642 P.2d 1294,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 320

(Wyo. 1982); Britton v. State, 643 P.2d 935,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 332

(Wyo. 1982); Haight v. State, 654 P.2d 1232,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 416

(Wyo. 1982); Capwell v. State, 686 P.2d 1148,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 322

(Wyo. 1984); Martin v. State, 720 P.2d 894,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 570

(Wyo. 1986); Stinehart v. State, 727 P.2d 1010,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 637

(Wyo. 1986); Dean v. State, 931 P.2d 942,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1997).

Quoted

in

Sanchez v. State, 592 P.2d 1130,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 386

(Wyo. 1979); Sears v. State, 632 P.2d 946,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 368

(Wyo. 1981); Browder v. State, 639 P.2d 889,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1982); Amin v. State, 686 P.2d 593,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 331

(Wyo. 1984); Campbell v. State, 728 P.2d 628,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 640

(Wyo. 1986); Herdt v. State, 816 P.2d 1299,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 145

(Wyo. 1991); Heinemann v. State, 12 P.3d 692,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 214

(Wyo. 2000); McGarvey v. State, 2014 WY 66,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(May 28, 2014).

Stated

in

Vasquez v. State, 623 P.2d 1205,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 296

(Wyo. 1981); Price v. State, 716 P.2d 324,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 508

(Wyo. 1986); Velos v. State, 752 P.2d 411,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1988).

Cited

in

Evans v. State, 653 P.2d 308,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 399

(Wyo. 1982);
Freeze v. State, 662 P.2d 415,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 315

(Wyo. 1983);
Schmidt v. State, 668 P.2d 656,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 356

(Wyo. 1983);
Stogner v. State, 792 P.2d 1358,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(Wyo. 1990);
Dichard v. State, 844 P.2d 484,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 207

(Wyo. 1992);
Vigil v. State, 859 P.2d 659,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 148

(Wyo. 1993);
Hansen v. State, 904 P.2d 811,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 194

(Wyo. 1995);
Wilkening v. State, 922 P.2d 1381,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 124

(Wyo. 1996);
Trusky v. State, 7 P.3d 5,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 130

(Wyo. 2000);
Chapman v. State, 2001 WY 25, 18 P.3d 1164,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 2001);
Ford v. State, 2003 WY 65, 69 P.3d 407,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 80

(Wyo. 2003);
Giles v. State, 2004 WY 101, 96 P.3d 1027,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 129

(2004);
Heywood v. State, 2007 WY 149, 170 P.3d 1227,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 168

(Sept. 19, 2007);
Scott v. State, 2012 WY 86, 278 P.3d 747,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 91

(June 18, 2012);Hirsch v. State, 2006 WY 66, 135 P.3d 586,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. May 31, 2006); Norgaard v. State, 2014 WY 157,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 181

(Dec. 9, 2014); Lindstrom v. State, 2015 WY 28,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Feb. 25, 2015); Hamilton v. State, 2017 WY 72, 396 P.3d 1009,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 72

(Wyo. 2017).

Condition of probation. —

Where a defendant entered Alford guilty pleas to violating Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

6-2-502

,

6-4-103

,

6-1-303

, and

6-2-302

, the district court did not abuse its discretion by imposing as a condition of his probation following his term of incarceration that he have no contact with his minor children. A no contact condition was reasonably related to the violent sexual crimes for which he was convicted and for which he was charged, and the provision did not impermissibly encroach on his fundamental right as a parent to raise his children. Perkins v. State, 2014 WY 11, 317 P.3d 584,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 2014).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Changing Structure of Criminal Sentencing,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 591 (1983).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part one), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 107 (1984).

For case notes, “Constitutional Law—Double Jeopardy—A Constitutional Protection or a Formality to Sidestep in Successive Prosecutions?
Harvey v. State, 835 P.2d 1074,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 1992),” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 661 (1993).

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Modern status of admissibility in forcible rape prosecution of complainant's general reputation for unchastity, 95 ALR3d 1181.

Standard of proof required under statute providing for commitment of sexual offenders or sexual psychopaths, 96 ALR3d 840.

Validity and construction of statute defining crime of rape to include activity traditionally punishable as sodomy or the like, 3 ALR4th 1009.

Admissibility of expert testimony as to whether accused had specific intent necessary for conviction, 16 ALR4th 666.

Admissibility of expert opinion stating whether a particular knife was, or could have been, the weapon used in a crime, 83 ALR4th 660.

Defense of mistake of fact as to victim's consent in rape prosecution, 102 ALR5th 447.